Hawaii statutes.
§712-1240.9 Methamphetamine trafficking;
restitution and reimbursement. When sentencing a defendant convicted of
methamphetamine trafficking pursuant to section 712-1240.7 or 712-1240.8 as
that section was in effect prior to July 1, 2016, the court may order
restitution or reimbursement to the State or appropriate county government for
the cost incurred for any cleanup associated with the manufacture or
distribution of methamphetamine and to any other person injured as a result of
the manufacture or distribution of methamphetamine. [L 2006, c 230, pt of §4;
am L 2016, c 231, §53]

COMMENTARY ON §§712-1240.7 TO 712-1240.9

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, added §§712-1240.7 and
712-1240.8, methamphetamine trafficking in the first and second degrees. House
Standing Committee Report No. 665-06.

Act 230, Session Laws 2006, also added §712-1240.9,
authorizing a court to order restitution or reimbursement when sentencing a
defendant convicted under §712-1240.7 or §712-1240.8.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, amended §712-1240.7 by, among
other things, removing possession and distribution of methamphetamine from the
statute. Act 231 placed possession and distribution of methamphetamine in the
statutes relating to promoting a dangerous drug [§§712-1241 and 712-1242],
which gives the court the discretion to impose probation and drug treatment
when appropriate. The offenses remaining in §712-1240.7 are distribution of
methamphetamine to a minor and manufacturing of methamphetamine, which remain
class A felonies. The amendments implemented recommendations made by the Penal
Code Review Committee convened pursuant to House Concurrent Resolution No. 155,
S.D. 1 (2015). The Penal Code Review Committee commented, on page 59 of its
report, that "[w]hile the Committee recognizes these dangers and
challenges, it is of the opinion that the current Methamphetamine Trafficking
statutes are not properly addressing those challenges and should be changed
based on the experience of the Committee regarding the application of these provisions
in the criminal justice system in Hawaii." House Standing Committee
Report No. 660-16.

Act 231, Session Laws 2016, repealed §712-1240.8 and amended
§712-1240.9 by making a conforming amendment. Act 231 implemented
recommendations made by the Penal Code Review Committee convened pursuant to
House Concurrent Resolution No. 155, S.D. 1 (2015).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next